Utah statutes.
9-6-306.   Collection.

(1)  All works of art acquired under this part shall become part of the Utah State Alice Art Collection.

(2)  The art collection shall be held as the property of the state, under control of the division, and may be loaned in whole or in part for exhibition purposes to different parts of the state according to rules prescribed by the board.

(3)  The division shall take every precaution to avoid damage or destruction to the property of the institute and the art works submitted by exhibitors and shall procure ample insurance on them.

(4)  All art works shipped to and from the place of exhibition shall be packed by an expert packer.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

